District of Columbia statutes.
7-1141.03

Appointment of Director.

The Department shall be headed by a Director, who shall:

(1)

Be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council, pursuant to § 1-523.01(a);

(2)

Be qualified by experience and training to carry out the purposes of the Department as set forth in § 7-1141.05; and

(3)

Serve at the pleasure of the Mayor.

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5114, 60 DCR 12472

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5114 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5114 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 5111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.